Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.0364

Sports wagering authorized.

(1) Upon the request of a federally recognized Indian tribe or tribes in the state of Washington, the tribe's class III gaming compact may be amended pursuant to the Indian gaming regulatory act, 25 U.S.C. Sec. 2701 et seq., and RCW 9.46.360 to authorize the tribe to conduct and operate sports wagering on its Indian lands, provided the amendment addresses: Licensing; fees associated with the gambling commission's regulation of sports wagering; how sports wagering will be conducted, operated, and regulated; issues related to criminal enforcement, including money laundering, sport integrity, and information sharing between the commission and the tribe related to such enforcement; and responsible and problem gambling. Sports wagering conducted pursuant to the gaming compact is a gambling activity authorized by this chapter.

(2) Sports wagering conducted pursuant to the provisions of a class III gaming compact entered into by a tribe and the state pursuant to RCW 9.46.360 is authorized bookmaking and is not subject to civil or criminal penalties pursuant to RCW 9.46.225.

[ 2020 c 127 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—2020 c 127: "It has long been the policy of this state to prohibit all forms and means of gambling except where carefully and specifically authorized and regulated. The legislature intends to further this policy by authorizing sports wagering on a very limited basis by restricting it to tribal casinos in the state of Washington. Tribes have more than twenty years' experience with, and a proven track record of, successfully operating and regulating gaming facilities in accordance with tribal gaming compacts. Tribal casinos can operate sports wagering pursuant to these tribal gaming compacts, offering the benefits of the same highly regulated environment to sports wagering." [ 2020 c 127 s 1.]

Effective date—2020 c 127: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 25, 2020]." [ 2020 c 127 s 15.]